Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-19,154
Foreign corporation; resignation of registered agent.

(a) The registered agent of a foreign corporation may resign as agent by signing and delivering to the Secretary of State for filing the original and two exact or conformed copies of a statement of resignation. The statement of resignation may include a statement that the registered office is also discontinued.

(b) After filing the statement, the Secretary of State shall attach the filing receipt to one copy and mail the copy and receipt to the registered office if not discontinued. The Secretary of State shall mail the other copy to the foreign corporation at its principal office address shown in its most recent biennial report.

(c) The agency is terminated, and the registered office discontinued if so provided, on the thirty-first day after the date on which the statement was filed.

Laws 1996, LB 681, § 154.